Illinois, session 104th, HB5156.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,670,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Illinois Arts Council for a grant to the Illinois 7Humanities Council. 8    Section 10. The amount of $250,000, or so much of that sum 9as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 10fund to the Department of Natural Resources for a grant to the 11Illinois Humanities Council for costs associated with the 12Illinois America 250th Commemoration, including general 13operating costs associated with State commemoration efforts. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.